lt-LT: Suderinama garinama medžiaga: Koncentratas / vaškas; Sausa žolė; E. skystis; Kaitinamojo tabako lazdelės; Kelių tipų medžiagos; Alyvos kasetė; Kietas koncentratas; Kita
ko: 호환 기화 물질: 농축액/왁스; 건조 허브; E-리퀴드; 궐련형 전자담배 스틱; 다중 소재; 오일 카트리지; 고체 농축액; 기타
tr: Uyumlu buharlaştırıcı malzeme: Konsantre/wax; Kuru bitki; E-likit; Isıtılmış tütün çubukları; Çoklu materyal; Yağ kartuşu; Katı konsantre; Diğer
fr: Type de matériau vaporisable compatible: Concentré/cire; Herbe sèche; E-liquide; Bâtonnets de tabac à chauffer; Multi-matériaux; Cartouche d'huile; Concentré solide; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni materijal za isparavanje: Koncentrat / vosak; Suho bilje; E-tekućina; Štapići za grijanje duhana; Više materijala; Uložak s uljem; Čvrsti koncentrat; Ostalo
it: Materiale vaporizzabile compatibile: Concentrato/cera; Erba secca; E-liquid; Stick di tabacco riscaldato; Multimateriale; Cartuccia di olio; Concentrato solido; Altro
sv: Kompatibla förångningsmaterial: Koncentrat/vax; Torra örter; E-vätska; Uppvärmda tobaksstickor; Multimaterial; Oljepatron; Fast koncentrat; Övrigt
sk-SK: Kompatibilný odparovací materiál: Koncentrát/vosk; Sušené byliny; E-liquid; Náplne zo zahrievaného tabaku; Viacero materiálov; Olejový cartridge; Pevný koncentrát; Iné
de: Kompatibles Verdampfungsmaterial: Konzentrat/Wachs; Trockenkräuter; E-Liquid; Erhitzte Tabaksticks; Multimaterial; Öl-Kartusche; Festes Konzentrat; Sonstige
hu: Kompatibilis párologtató anyag: Koncentrátum/viasz; Száraz gyógynövény; E-liquid; Hevített dohányrudak; Többféle anyag; Olajpatron; Szilárd koncentrátum; Egyéb
th: วัสดุทำระเหยที่รองรับการใช้งานร่วมกัน: สารสกัด/แวกซ์; สมุนไพรแห้ง; น้ำยาบุหรี่ไฟฟ้า; แท่งยาสูบแบบใช้ความร้อน; วัสดุผสม; ตลับน้ำมัน; สารสกัดแบบแข็ง; อื่นๆ
es: Material vaporizador compatible: Concentrado/cera; Hierba seca; E-líquido; Cigarrillos de tabaco calentado; Multimaterial; Cartucho de aceite; Concentrado sólido; Otro
pl: Kompatybilny materiał do waporyzacji: Koncentrat/wosk; Susz; E-liquid; Wkłady tytoniowe do podgrzewania; Wiele materiałów; Wkład olejowy; Koncentrat stały; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместим материал за изпаряване: Концентрат/вакса; Суха билка; Течност за електронни цигари; Нагреваеми тютюневи стикове; Мултиматериал; Пълнител с масло; Твърд концентрат; Друг
ro-RO: Material de vaporizare compatibil: Concentrat/ceară; Ierburi uscate; E-lichid; Rezerve de tutun încălzit; Multi-material; Cartuș cu ulei; Concentrat solid; Altele
ru: Совместимый материал для испарения: Концентрат/воск; Сухие травы; Жидкость для электронных сигарет; Стики для нагревания табака; Несколько материалов; Масляный картридж; Твердый концентрат; Другое
nl: Compatibel verdampingsmateriaal: Concentraat/wax; Droge kruiden; E-liquid; Verwarmde tabakssticks; Meerdere materialen; Oliecartridge; Vast concentraat; Overige
da: Kompatibelt fordampningsmateriale: Koncentrat/voks; Tørrede urter; E-væske; Opvarmede tobakspinde; Multimateriale; Oliepatron; Fast koncentrat; Andet
cs: Kompatibilní odpařovací materiál: Koncentrát/vosk; Sušené byliny; E-liquid; Zahřívané tabákové náplně; Více materiálů; Olejová cartridge; Pevný koncentrát; Jiné
fi: Yhteensopiva höyrystettävä materiaali: Tiiviste/vaha; Kuivayrtti; E-neste; Kuumennettavat tupakkatikut; Monimateriaali; Öljypatruuna; Kiinteä tiiviste; Muu
zh-TW: 相容的汽化材料: 濃縮物/蠟; 乾燥草本; 電子煙油; 加熱菸彈; 多材質; 煙油匣; 固體濃縮物; 其他
pt-BR: Material de vaporização compatível: Concentrado/wax; Erva seca; E-líquido; Bastões de tabaco aquecido; Multimaterial; Cartucho de óleo; Concentrado sólido; Outro
el: Συμβατό υλικό εξάτμισης: Συμπύκνωμα/κερί; Ξηρό βότανο; Υγρό αναπλήρωσης (e-liquid); Ράβδοι θερμαινόμενου καπνού; Πολλαπλών υλικών; Κάψουλα λαδιού; Στερεό συμπύκνωμα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material de vaporização compatível: Concentrado/cera; Erva seca; E-líquido; Sticks de tabaco aquecido; Multimaterial; Cartucho de óleo; Concentrado sólido; Outro
sl-SI: Združljiv material za uparjanje: Koncentrat/vosek; Suha zelišča; E-tekočina; Ogrevane tobačne palčke; Več materialov; Oljna kartuša; Trdni koncentrat; Drugo
nb: Kompatibelt fordampningsmateriale: Konsentrat/voks; Tørre urter; E-væske; Oppvarmede tobakkspinner; Flere materialer; Oljepatron; Fast konsentrat; Annet
ja: 互換性のある気化素材: コンセントレート/ワックス; ドライハーブ; Eリキッド; 加熱式たばこスティック; マルチ素材; オイルカートリッジ; 固形コンセントレート; その他
vi: Vật liệu hóa hơi tương thích: Tinh chất/sáp; Thảo mộc khô; Tinh dầu; Thuốc lá làm nóng; Đa vật liệu; Hộp dầu; Tinh chất dạng rắn; Khác
en: Compatible vaporizing material: Concentrate/wax; Dry herb; E-liquid; Heated tobacco sticks; Multi-material; Oil cartridge; Solid concentrate; Other
zh-CN: 适配雾化材料: 浓缩物/蜡; 干草本; 电子烟油; 加热烟弹; 多材质; 烟油弹; 固体浓缩物; 其他